Utah, session 2026, HB294.
Section 1. Section 13-47-201 is amended to read:13-47-201. Verification required for new hires.(1)A private employer who employs 15050100125 or more employees on or after May 4, 2022July 1, 2027, may not hire a new employee on or after May 4, 2022July 1, 2027, unless the private employer:(a)is registered with a status verification system to verify the federal legal working status of any new employee; and(b)uses the status verification system to verify the federal legal working status of the new employee in accordance with the requirements of the status verification system.(2)This section does not apply to a private employer of a foreign national if the foreign national holds a visa issued in response to a petition by the private employer that is classified as H-2A or H-2B.(3)A person who uses fraudulent identification documentation, or the identification documentation of another person, for the purpose of obtaining employment is subject to criminal prosecution, including, as applicable, under:(a)Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 5, Fraud; or(b)Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 11, Identity Fraud Act.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.